test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-piezaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - piezā: # Noun 25 'eng /est pesa/fin' - full paradigm
     piezā+N+Sg+Nom: piezā
     piezā+N+Sg+Gen: piezā
     piezā+N+Sg+Par: [pieʼzzõ, piezzõ]
     piezā+N+Sg+Dat: piezān
     piezā+N+Sg+Ins: piezāks
     piezā+N+Sg+Ill: [pieʼzzõ, piezzõ]
     piezā+N+Sg+Ela: piezāst
     piezā+N+Pl+Nom: piezād
     piezā+N+Pl+Gen: piezād
     piezā+N+Pl+Par: [peʼžḑi, pežḑi]
     piezā+N+Pl+Dat: piezādõn
     piezā+N+Pl+Ins: piezādõks
     piezā+N+Pl+Ill: piezīž
     piezā+N+Pl+Ela: piezīst
